Hawaii statutes.
[§431:19-202] Applicable law. (a) A
special purpose financial captive insurance company shall be subject to the
provisions of this part and to part I. If there is any conflict between this
part and part I, this part shall control.

(b) A special purpose financial captive
insurance company shall be subject to all applicable rules adopted pursuant to
section 431:19-114 that are in effect as of July 1, 2008 and that are adopted
after July 1, 2008.

(c) The commissioner, by order, may exempt a
special purpose financial captive insurance company from any provision of this
article or from any rule adopted pursuant to section 431:19-114 if the
commissioner determines the provision to be inappropriate, given the nature of
risks to be insured by the special purpose financial captive insurance company
or its approved plan of operation, and that the public interest is being served
or protected, and that reasonable expectations of the policyholders and
consumers will be maintained.

(d) Nothing in this part shall be construed to
affect chapter 485A in any manner. [L 2008, c 190, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"July 1, 2008" substituted for "the effective
date of this part".

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next